Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1227.01
Activities subject to standards; contractor, supervisor, and technician authority; landowner rights.

(1) All water well construction and monitoring, pump and pumping equipment installation and repair, and decommissioning shall be accomplished following the standards developed under the Water Well Standards and Contractors' Practice Act.

(2) A licensed water well contractor may have supervisory authority over all employees.

(3) A licensed water well drilling supervisor shall work under the supervision of a licensed water well contractor and may have supervisory authority over nonlicensed employees.

(4) A licensed pump installation contractor may have supervisory authority over all employees.

(5) A licensed pump installation supervisor shall work under the supervision of a licensed pump installation contractor and may have supervisory authority over nonlicensed employees.

(6) A licensed water well monitoring technician may work independently and shall not have supervisory authority.

(7) A licensed natural resources ground water technician employed by a natural resources district may work independently and shall not have supervisory authority over any licensed or nonlicensed persons.

(8) An individual who owns land and uses it for farming, ranching, or agricultural purposes or as his or her place of abode may, on such land, construct a water well, install a pump in a well, or decommission a driven sandpoint well.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1158;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 63.
July 1, 2021